Hawaii, session 2026, SB1105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $28,840,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of financing capital improvement projects for construction defect remediation at the Hawaii state hospital. SECTION 2. The sum appropriated in section 1 of this Act shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. The appropriation made for the capital improvement project authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $70,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) building manager position, who shall be subject to chapter 76, Hawaii Revised Statutes. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________